Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1411.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 2126.1. Perimenopause and Menopause Education.--The Department of Health shall have the power, and its duty shall be, to:(1) E nter into partnerships with health care providers, including obstetricians and gynecologists, and community-based health centers and hospitals to educate women on the symptoms, processes and other issues surrounding perimenopause and menopause so that women may be prepared for perimenopause and menopause.(2) Create informational materials in electronic and physical form, in coordination with the partners described in paragraph (1), which may be distributed to or accessed by women who are determined by their health care provider to be experiencing or are soon to be experiencing perimenopause and menopause. The informational materials must include:(i) Symptoms of and treatments for perimenopause and menopause.(ii) Symptoms of perimenopause and menopause for which a woman would consult a health care provider.(iii) The biological process behind perimenopause and menopause.(iv) How to talk to family and friends about perimenopause and menopause.(v) Any other information that the Department of Health deems necessary to prepare and educate women regarding perimenopause and menopause.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1411PN1612 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627